Hawaii statutes.
§195D-10 Severability. Should any
section, subsection, sentence, clause, or phrase of this chapter, or any rule
adopted pursuant thereto be for any reason held by a court of competent
jurisdiction to be invalid, such decision shall not affect the validity of the
remaining portions of this chapter or rule adopted pursuant thereto. [L 1975, c
65, pt of §1; am L 1983, c 111, §11]

Note

The amendment made by L 2014, c 218, §8 is not included in
this section.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next